test/tools/xre.automatic-multichar-symbols.lexc
! simplified from Beesley & Karttunen p. 278
Multichar_Symbols +Noun

Definitions
	Digits = [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]+ %+Int:0 ;

LEXICON Root
dog	N	;
cat	N	;
rat	N	;
< Digits >	#	;

LEXICON N
+Noun:0	Num	;

LEXICON Num
< %+Sg:0 >	#	;
< %+Pl:s >	#	;
